ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 겨울 스포츠/액티비티 > 스키/스노보드 > 스노보드: 스노스케이트; 스플릿보드
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes e atividades de inverno > Esqui e snowboarding > Pranchas de snowboard: Snowskates; Splitboards
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Žiemos sportas ir veikla > Slidinėjimas ir snieglenčių sportas > Snieglentės: Sniegriedučiai; Padalintos snieglentės
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og -aktiviteter > Ski og snowboard > Snowboards: Snowskates; Splitboards
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Sporty zimowe i rekreacja zimą > Jazda na nartach i snowboardzie > Deski snowboardowe: Deski snowskate; Splitboardy
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Zimski sportovi i aktivnosti > Skijanje i snowboardanje > Snowboardi: Snježne klizaljke; Splitboard
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Wintersport en -activiteiten > Skiën en snowboarden > Snowboards: Snowskates; Splitboards
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 冬季运动与活动 > 滑雪与单板滑雪 > 滑雪板: 雪地滑板; 分离式单板滑雪板
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zimní sporty a aktivity > Lyžování a snowboarding > Snowboardy: Snowskaty; Splitboardy
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウィンタースポーツ > スキー・スノーボード用品 > スノーボード: スノースケート; スプリットボード
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og aktiviteter > Ski- og snowboardutstyr > Snowboard: Snowskates; Splitboards
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Talviurheilu ja -harrastukset > Hiihto ja lumilautailu > Lumilaudat: Lumiskeittilaudat; Splitboardit
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Hoạt động và thể thao mùa đông > Trượt tuyết băng đồng và trượt ván trên tuyết > Ván để trượt tuyết: Ván trượt tuyết (snowskate); Ván trượt tuyết tách đôi
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport e attività invernali > Sci e snowboard > Tavole da snowboard: Snowskate; Splitboard
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Зимни спортове и дейности > Каране на ски и сноуборд > Сноубордове: Снежни кънки; Сплитбордове
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 冬季運動 > 單/雙板滑雪 > 滑雪板: 雪地滑板; 分離式單板滑雪板
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Téli sportok és tevékenységek > Síelés és snowboardozás > Snowboardok: Snowskate-ek; Splitboardok
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Zimski športi in dejavnosti > Smučanje in deskanje na snegu > Snežne deske: Snowskate deske; Splitboardi
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Vintersporter och -aktiviteter > Skid- och snowboardåkning > Snowboardbrädor: Snowskates; Splitboards
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Activités et sports d'hiver > Ski et snowboard > Planches de snowboard: Snowskates; Splitboards
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Atividades e desportos de inverno > Esqui e snowboard > Pranchas de snowboard: Snowskates; Splitboards
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Зимние виды спорта и игры > Лыжный спорт и сноубординг > Сноуборды: Сноускейты; Сплитборды
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาและกิจกรรมในฤดูหนาว > สกีและสโนว์บอร์ด > สโนว์บอร์ด: สโนว์สเกต; สปลิตบอร์ด
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kış Sporları ve Aktiviteleri > Kayak ve Snowboard > Snowboard'lar: Kar kaykayları; Splitboardlar
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Χειμερινά αθλήματα & δραστηριότητες > Σκι & σνόουμπορντ > Σνόουμπορντ: Snowskate; Splitboard
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Actividades y deportes de invierno > Esquí y snowboard > Tablas de snowboard: Snowskates; Splitboards
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Activități și sporturi de iarnă > Schi și snowboarding > Plăci de snowboard: Patine de zăpadă; Splitboarduri
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Zimné športy a aktivity > Lyžovanie a snowboarding > Snowboardy: Snežné korčule; Splitboardy
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Wintersport & -Aktivitäten > Skisport & Snowboarden > Snowboards: Snowskates; Splitboards
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Winter Sports & Activities > Skiing & Snowboarding > Snowboards: Snowskates; Splitboards